Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7382.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-10.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10.1 entitled "Special
Licenses for Motorcycles, Motor Scooters, Low-Speed Vehicles and Other Motor Driven Cycles"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10.1-4. Required equipment.
Operators of motorcycles, motor scooters, and motor-driven cycles shall use eye protection
of a type approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles when operating their
vehicles on streets and highways. Every motorcycle, motor scooter, and motor-driven cycle shall
be equipped with a rear view mirror. Any operator under the age of twenty-one (21) shall wear a
helmet of a type approved by the administrator of motor vehicles. In addition, all new operators,
regardless of age, shall be required, for a period of one year from the date of issuance of the first
license pursuant to § 31-10.1-1, to wear a helmet of a type approved by said administrator. Any
person deemed in violation of this provision shall be subject to the fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-
4, which shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of chapter 41.1 of this title. The
administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to set forth rules and regulations
governing the use of other equipment on those vehicles. All fines collected under this section shall
be deposited in a general restricted receipt account for the use of the Rhode Island governor’s office
on highway safety in order to promote educational and informational programs encouraging helmet
use.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004322
========
LC004322 - Page 2 of 3